New York, session 2025-2026, S7974.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The general business law is amended by adding a new section 2 394-i to read as follows: 3 § 394-i. Recovery of online accounts for mobile telephones. A person 4 or business that provides a consumer an online account to access or 5 modify access to such consumer's mobile telephone shall, if a consumer 6 cannot access such online account, provide an opportunity to prove their 7 identity in person using two forms of physical proof of identification 8 including but not limited to: (1) a valid passport issued by the United 9 States government or another country; (2) a valid driver's license or 10 non-driver's identification card issued by this or another state, the 11 federal government, any United States territory, commonwealth or 12 possession, or the District of Columbia, bearing the consumer's name, 13 photograph and date of birth; (3) a social security card issued by the 14 social security administration; or (4) a certified or official copy of a 15 birth certificate, to recover such online account and restore access 16 thereto, provided that the person or business providing such online 17 account for mobile telephone access has a physical presence and at least 18 one retail location within this state. For purposes of this section, 19 mobile telephone shall be defined as such term is defined in paragraph 20 (a) of subdivision one of section twelve hundred twenty-five-c of the 21 vehicle and traffic law. 22 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01036-04-5